California statutes. Elections Code
(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person who receives money or other valuable consideration to assist another to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration from the elector, and fails to comply with Section 2159, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months or if the failure to comply is found to be willful, not exceeding one year, or both.

(b) A person who receives money or other valuable consideration to assist another to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration from the elector, upon a third or subsequent conviction, on charges brought and separately tried, for failure to
 comply with Section 2159 shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or both.

(c) This section does not apply to a public agency or its employees that is designated as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.), if an elector asks for assistance to register to vote during the course and scope of the agency’s normal business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 123.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person who receives money or other valuable consideration to assist another to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration from the elector, and knowingly misrepresents himself or herself as having helped register another to vote on a registration form, pursuant to Section 2159, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) A person who receives money or other valuable consideration to assist another to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration from the elector, upon a third or subsequent conviction, on
 charges brought and separately tried, for misrepresenting himself or herself as having helped register another to vote on a registration form, pursuant to Section 2159, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) This section does not apply to a public agency or its employees that is designated as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.), if an elector asks for assistance to register to vote during the course and scope of the agency’s normal business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 124.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.5.

(a) A person, company, or other organization that agrees to pay money or other valuable consideration, whether on a per-affidavit basis or otherwise, to a person who assists another person to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration, or by assisting with the submission of an affidavit of registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State, who fails to comply with Section 2159.5, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months or when the failure to comply is found to be willful, not exceeding one year, or both.

(b) A person, company, or other organization that agrees to pay money or other valuable consideration, whether on a per-affidavit basis or otherwise, to a person who assists another person to register to vote by receiving the completed affidavit of registration, or by assisting with the submission of an affidavit of registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State, upon a third or subsequent conviction, on charges brought and separately tried, for failure to comply with Section 2159.5 shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or both.

(c) An elections official shall notify a person, company, or other organization that agrees to pay money or other valuable consideration, whether on a per-affidavit basis or otherwise, to a person who assists another person to register to vote by receiving the completed
 affidavit of registration or by assisting with the submission of an affidavit of registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State, that three or more affidavits of registration submitted by a person who assisted another to register to vote do not comply with Sections 18100, 18101, 18103, or 18106. The elections official may forward a copy of each of the noncomplying affidavits of registration to the district attorney, who may make a determination whether probable cause exists to believe that a violation of law has occurred.

(d) This section shall not apply to a public agency or its employees that is designated as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501
 et seq.), when an elector asks for assistance to register to vote during the course and scope of the agency’s normal business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 33.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18109.

(a) It is a misdemeanor for a person in possession of information identified in Section 2138.5, or obtained pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2183) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of this code or Section 7924.000 of the Government Code, knowingly to use or permit the use of all or any part of that information for any purpose other than as permitted by law.

(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person knowingly to acquire possession or use of voter registration information from the Secretary of State or a county elections official without first complying with Section 2188.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 102.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

18110.

(a) For purposes of this section, “home address” means only street address and does not include an individual’s city or post office address.

(b) Any person or public entity who, in violation of Section 2194, discloses the home address or telephone number listed on a voter registration card of any of the following individuals is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) An active or retired peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) An employee of a city police department or a county sheriff’s office.

(3) The spouse or children of the individuals specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) who live with those individuals.

(c) Any person or public entity, who in violation of Section 2194, discloses the home address or telephone number listed on a voter registration card of any individual specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b), and that violation results in bodily injury to any of those individuals, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1207, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18111.

Any person, individual, or organization that knowingly violates Section 2138.5 is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). Prosecution for a violation of Section 2138.5 shall not prohibit prosecution under any other applicable provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18112.

Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this chapter, the court may order as a condition of probation that the convicted person be prohibited from receiving money or other valuable consideration for assisting another person to register to vote by receiving the completed
 affidavit of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Nomination of Candidates [18200. - 18205.]

18200.

Every person who subscribes to any nomination petition a fictitious name, or who intentionally subscribes thereto the name of another, or who causes another to subscribe a fictitious name to a nomination petition, is guilty of a felony and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 62.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18201.

Any person who falsely makes or fraudulently defaces or destroys all or any part of a nomination paper, is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 63.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18202.

Every person acting on behalf of a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor who deliberately fails to file at the proper time and in the proper place any nomination paper or declaration of candidacy in his or her possession that is entitled to be filed under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18203.

Any person who files or submits for filing a nomination paper or declaration of candidacy knowing that it or any part of it has been made falsely is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 64.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18204.

Any person who willfully suppresses all or any part of a nomination paper or declaration of candidacy either before or after filing is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 65.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18205.

A person shall not directly or through any other person advance, pay, solicit, or receive or cause to be advanced, paid, solicited, or received, any money or other valuable consideration to or for the use of any person in order to induce a person not to become or to withdraw as a candidate for public office. Violation of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 66.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Election Campaigns [18301. - 18390.]



  ARTICLE 1. Campaign Literature [18301. - 18304.]

18301.

In addition to any other penalty, a person who prints or otherwise duplicates, or causes to be printed or duplicated, a simulated ballot or simulated county voter information guide that does not contain the statement required by Section 20009, or that uses an official seal or insignia in violation of Section 20009, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 79.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18302.

(a) A person is guilty of a misdemeanor who knowingly causes to be mailed or distributed, or knowingly mails or distributes, literature to a voter that includes a designation of the voter’s precinct polling place other than a precinct polling place listed for that voter in an official precinct polling list that constituted the latest official precinct polling list at sometime not more than 30 days prior to the mailing or distribution.

(b) A person is guilty of a misdemeanor who, with actual knowledge and intent to deceive, causes to be distributed or distributes, including distribution by mail, radio or television broadcast, telephone call, text message, email, or any other electronic means, including over the Internet, literature or any other form of communication
 to a voter that includes any of the following:

(1) The incorrect location of a vote center, office of an elections official, satellite office of an elections official where voting is permitted, vote by mail ballot drop box, or vote by mail ballot drop-off location.

(2) False or misleading information regarding the qualifications to vote or to register to vote.

(3) False or misleading information regarding the qualifications to apply for, receive, or return a vote by mail ballot.

(4) False or misleading information regarding the date of an election or the days, dates, or times voting may occur at a place described in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 109, Sec. 3.   (SB 739)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18303.

Every person who violates Section 84305 of the Government Code relating to mass mailing is subject to the penal provisions set forth in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 91000) of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18304.

(a) Any person who uses or allows to be used any reproduction or facsimile of the seal of the county or the seal of a local government agency in any campaign literature or mass mailing, as defined in Section 82041.5 of the Government Code, with intent to deceive the voters, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) For purposes of this section, the use of a reproduction or facsimile of a seal in a manner that creates a misleading, erroneous, or false impression that the document is authorized by a public official is evidence of intent to deceive.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “local government agency” means a school district, special or other district, or any other board, commission, or agency of local jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Political Party Caucuses [18310. - 18311.]

18310.

A person shall not directly or through any other person pay or receive any money or other valuable consideration before, during, or after an election in order to reward any person or as a reward for voting for or against or agreeing to vote for or against the election or endorsement of any other person as the nominee or candidate of any caucus, convention, organized assemblage of delegates, or other body representing or claiming to represent a political party, candidate, or principle, or any club, society, or association. A violation of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 67.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18311.

Every person is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years who:

(a) Gives or offers a bribe to any officer or member of any political convention, committee, or political gathering of any kind, held for the purpose of nominating candidates for offices of honor, trust, or profit in this state, with intent to influence the person to whom the bribe is given or offered to be more favorable to one candidate than another.

(b) Being a member of any of the bodies mentioned in this section receives or offers to receive any bribe described in subdivision
 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 68.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deceptive Online Activities [18320. - 18323.]

18320.

(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the “California Political Cyberfraud Abatement Act.”

(b) It is unlawful for a person, with intent to mislead, deceive, or defraud, to commit an act of political cyberfraud.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Political cyberfraud” means a knowing and willful act concerning a political Web site that is committed with the intent to deny a person access to a political Web site, deny a person the opportunity to register a domain name for a political Web site, or cause a person reasonably to
 believe that a political Web site has been posted by a person other than the person who posted the Internet Web site, and would cause a reasonable person, after reading the Internet Web site, to believe the site actually represents the views of the proponent or opponent of a ballot measure or of a candidate for public office. Political cyberfraud includes, but is not limited to, any of the following acts:

(A) Intentionally diverting or redirecting access to a political Web site to another person’s Internet Web site by the use of a similar domain name, meta-tags, or other electronic measures.

(B) Intentionally preventing or denying exit from a political Web site by the use of frames, hyperlinks, mousetrapping, popup screens, or other electronic measures.

(C) Registering a domain name that is similar to another domain name for a political Web site.

(D) Intentionally preventing the use of a domain name for a political Web site by registering and holding the domain name or by reselling it to another with the intent of preventing its use, or both.

(2) “Domain name” means any alphanumeric designation that is registered with or assigned by any domain name registrar, domain name registry, or other domain registration authority as part of an electronic address on the Internet.

(3) “Political Web site” means an Internet Web site that urges or appears to urge the support or opposition of a ballot measure or a
 candidate for public office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (AB 1104)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18321.

This article does not apply to a domain name registrar, registry, or registration authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18322.

In addition to any other remedies available under law, a court may order the transfer of a domain name as part of the relief awarded for a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18323.

Jurisdiction for actions brought pursuant to this article shall be in accordance with Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Political Meetings [18340. - 18340.]

18340.

Every person who, by threats, intimidations, or unlawful violence, willfully hinders or prevents electors from assembling in public meetings for the consideration of public questions is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Misrepresentation by Candidates [18350. - 18351.]

18350.

(a) A person is guilty of a misdemeanor who, with intent to mislead the voters in connection with his or her campaign for nomination or election to a public office, or in connection with the campaign of another person for nomination or election to a public office, does either of the following acts:

(1) Assumes, pretends, or implies, by his or her statements, conduct, or campaign materials, that he or she is the incumbent of a public office when that is not the case.

(2) Assumes, pretends, or implies, by his or her
 statements, conduct, or campaign materials, that he or she is or has been acting in the capacity of a public officer when that is not the case.

(b) A violation of this section may be enjoined in a civil action brought by a candidate for the public office
 involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (AB 370)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18351.

Any candidate in an election or incumbent in a recall election who knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact in a candidate’s statement, prepared pursuant to Section 11327 or 13307, with the intent to mislead the voters in connection with his or her campaign for nomination or election to a nonpartisan office is punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Solicitation of Funds [18360. - 18361.]

18360.

Any person who violates Section 20201 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18361.

Upon the complaint of the affected candidate or committee, any person who violates Section 20202 or 20203 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Electioneering [18370. - 18372.]

18370.

(a) A person shall not, on election day, or at any time that a voter may be casting a ballot, within the 100 foot limit specified in subdivision (b), do any of the following:

(1) Circulate an initiative, referendum, recall, or nomination petition or any other petition.

(2) Solicit a vote or speak to a voter on the subject of marking the voter’s ballot.

(3) Place a sign relating to voters’ qualifications or speak to a voter on the subject of the voter’s qualifications except as provided in Section 14240.

(4) Do any electioneering as defined by Section 319.5.

(b) The activities described in subdivision (a) are prohibited within 100 feet of either of the following:

(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place as defined by Section 338.5, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.

(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.

(c) A person shall not, on election day, or at any time that a voter may be casting a ballot, do any of the following within the immediate vicinity of a voter in line to cast a ballot or drop off a ballot:

(1) Solicit a vote.

(2) Speak to a voter about marking the voter’s ballot.

(3) Disseminate visible or audible electioneering information.

(d) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 5.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18371.

(a) No candidate or representative of a candidate, and no proponent, opponent, or representative of a proponent or opponent, of an initiative, referendum, or recall measure, or of a charter amendment, shall solicit the vote of a vote by mail voter, or do any electioneering, while in the residence or in the immediate presence of the voter, and during the time he or she knows the vote by mail voter is voting.

(b) Any person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) This section shall not be construed to conflict with any provision of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, nor to preclude electioneering by mail or telephone or in public places, except as prohibited by Section 18370, or by any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18372.

Notice regarding the prohibitions on electioneering set forth in this article shall be provided to the public. The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations specifying the manner in which such notice shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 318, Sec. 5.   (SB 35)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Vandalism at Polling Places [18380. - 18380.]

18380.

(a) A person, during any election, shall not do any of the following:

(1) Remove or destroy any of the supplies or other conveniences placed in the voting booths or compartments for the purpose of enabling the voter to prepare his or her ballot.

(2) Remove, tear down, or deface the cards printed for the instruction of voters.

(3) Remove, tear, mark, destroy, or otherwise deface any voter list or roster with the intent to falsify or prevent others from readily ascertaining the name, address, or political preference of any voter, or
 the fact that a voter has or has not voted.

(4) Remove, tear down, or deface the signs identifying the location of a polling place or identifying areas within 100 feet of a polling place.

(b) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 84.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Misuse of State Publications [18390. - 18390.]

18390.

An agency or department of the state shall not use its publications to advise state employees of a constitutional officer’s choice of candidates for public office or for recommending positions on specific ballot propositions not
 related to the functions of that agency or department.

For purposes of this section “publications” means any written or printed matter including, but not limited to, agency or department memorandums or directives, but shall not include legislative newsletters or state voter information guides.

A state officer who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 80.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Ballots [18400. - 18403.]

18400.

A person who makes, uses, keeps, or furnishes to others, paper or cards watermarked or overprinted in imitation of ballot paper or ballot cards is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 69.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18401.

Every person who prints any ballot not in conformity with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, or who circulates or gives to another any ballot, knowing at the time that the ballot does not conform to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18403.

Any person other than an elections official or a member of the precinct board who receives a voted ballot from a voter or who examines or solicits the voter to show their voted ballot is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. This section does
 not apply to persons returning a vote by mail ballot pursuant to
 Section 3017 or persons assisting a voter pursuant to Section 14282.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 35.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Corruption of the Voting Process [18500. - 18582.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18500. - 18504.]

18500.

Any person who commits fraud or attempts to commit fraud, and any person who aids or abets fraud or attempts to aid or abet fraud, in connection with any vote cast, to be cast, or attempted to be cast, is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18501.

Any public official who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this chapter, and thereby aids in any way the illegal casting or attempting to cast a vote, or who connives to nullify any of the provisions of this chapter in order that fraud may be perpetrated, shall forever be disqualified from holding office in this state and upon conviction shall be sentenced to a state prison for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18502.

(a) Any person who in any manner interferes with the officers holding an election or conducting a canvass, as to prevent the election or canvass from being fairly held and lawfully conducted, or with the voters lawfully exercising their rights of voting at an election, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(b) For purposes of this section, “officers holding an election or conducting a canvass” include, but are not limited to, the Secretary of State as the chief elections officer, and their staff, as it relates to performance of any of their duties related to administering the provisions of the
 Elections Code, and elections officials and their staff, including temporary workers and poll workers, and members of a precinct board, in their performance of any duty related to assisting with holding an election or conducting a canvass.

(c) For purposes of this section, “holding an election or conducting a canvass” includes, but is not limited to, the election observation process governed by the Elections Code and applicable regulations adopted by the Secretary of State.

(d) For purposes of this section, “voting at an election” includes, but is not limited to, voting in person at a polling place, the office of the elections official, and satellite locations, and voting by mail and returning a voted ballot pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 6.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18503.

An employer who violates Section 14004 shall be subject to a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per election. An action for a civil fine under this subdivision may be brought by the Secretary of State or any public prosecutor with jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 223, Sec. 4.   (AB 17)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18504.

Notice regarding the prohibitions on activity related to corruption of the voting process set forth in this chapter shall be provided to the public. The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations specifying the manner in which such notice shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 318, Sec. 6.   (SB 35)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Corruption of Voters [18520. - 18524.]

18520.

A person shall not directly or through another person give, offer, or promise any office, place, or employment, or promise to procure or endeavor to procure any office, place, or employment to or for any voter, or to or for any other person, in order to induce that voter at any election to:

(a) Refrain from voting.

(b) Vote for any particular person.

(c) Refrain from voting for any particular person.

A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of
 the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 72.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18521.

A person shall not directly or through any other person receive, agree, or contract for, before, during or after an election, any money, gift, loan, or other valuable consideration, office, place, or employment for himself or any other person because he or any other person:

(a) Voted, agreed to vote, refrained from voting, or agreed to refrain from voting for any particular person or measure.

(b) Remained away from the polls.

(c) Refrained or agreed to refrain from voting.

(d) Induced any other person to:

(1) Remain away from the polls.

(2) Refrain from voting.

(3) Vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure.

Any person violating this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 73.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18522.

Neither a person nor a controlled committee shall directly or through any other person or controlled committee pay, lend, or contribute, or offer or promise to pay, lend, or contribute, any money or other valuable consideration to or for any voter or to or for any other person to:

(a) Induce any voter to:

(1) Refrain from voting at any election.

(2) Vote or refrain from voting at an election for any particular person or measure.

(3) Remain away from the polls at an election.

(b) Reward any voter for having:

(1) Refrained from voting.

(2) Voted for any particular person or measure.

(3) Refrained from voting for any particular person or measure.

(4) Remained away from the polls at an election.

Any person or candidate violating this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 74.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18523.

A person shall not directly or through any other person advance or pay, or cause to be paid, any money or other valuable thing to or for the use of any other person, with the intent that it, or any part thereof, shall be used in bribery at any election, or knowingly pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing to any person in discharge or repayment of any money, wholly or in part, expended in bribery at any election.

Any person violating this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 75.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18524.

A person shall not directly or through any other person advance or pay, or cause to be paid, any money or other valuable thing to or for the use of any other person, with the intent that it, or any part thereof, will be used for boarding, lodging, or maintaining a person at any place or domicile in any election precinct, ward, or district, with intent to secure the vote of that person or to induce that person to vote for any particular person or measure.

Any person violating this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 76.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Intimidation of Voters [18540. - 18548.]

18540.

(a) Every person who makes use of or threatens to make use of any force, violence, or tactic of coercion or intimidation, to induce or compel any other person to vote or refrain from voting at any election or to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election, or because any person voted or refrained from voting at any election or voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or measure at any election is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(b) Every person who hires or arranges for any other person to make use of or threaten to
 make use of any force, violence, or tactic of coercion or intimidation, to induce or compel any other person to vote or refrain from voting at any election or to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any election, or because any person voted or refrained from voting at any election or voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or measure at any election is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years.

(c) For purposes of this section, “voting at any election” includes, but is not limited to, voting in person at a polling place, the office of the elections official, and satellite locations, and voting by mail and returning a voted ballot pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 3017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 296, Sec. 7.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18541.

(a) A person shall not, with the intent of dissuading another person from voting, within the 100 foot limit specified in subdivision (b), do any of the following:

(1) Solicit a vote or speak to a voter on the subject of marking the voter’s ballot.

(2) Place a sign relating to voters’ qualifications or speak to a voter on the subject of the voter’s qualifications except as provided in Section 14240.

(3) Photograph, video record, or otherwise record a voter entering or exiting a polling place.
